Utah statutes.
53A-17a-161.   English Language Learner Family Literacy Centers Program --
Report.
(1)  Money appropriated for the English Language Learner Family Literacy
Centers Program shall be used by school districts and charter schools to pay
for costs of English Language Learner Family Literacy Centers as provided in
this section.
(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the State Board of Education, after consultation with school districts
and charter schools, shall adopt a formula that allocates the money
appropriated by the Legislature for the English Language Learner Family
Literacy Centers Program to school districts and charter schools in a fair and
equitable manner.
(3)  English Language Learner Family Literacy Centers shall be established to:
(a)  increase parent involvement;
(b)  communicate with parents who are not proficient in English concerning
required and optional activities at the school, in the parents' preferred
language to the extent practicable;
(c)  increase academic achievement, literacy skills, and language gains in all
ethnic groups of students and their families;
(d)  coordinate with school administrators, educators, families, and students;
and
(e)  support and coordinate with other language acquisition instructional
services and language proficiency programs in the public schools.
(4)  The State Board of Education shall make a report to the Education Interim
Committee on the effectiveness of the English Language Learner Family Literacy
Centers Program before November 30, 2011.
